Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 2606YC (1) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 80B.6, subsection 1, paragraphs a, h, and 1 i, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. Three residents One resident of the state. 3 h. A police officer who is a member of a police department 4 of a city with a population of fifty twenty-five thousand 5 persons or more. 6 i. A police officer who is a member of a police department 7 of a city with a population of less than fifty twenty-five 8 thousand persons. 9 Sec. 2. Section 80B.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 10 by adding the following new paragraphs: 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . l. A member of the Iowa fraternal order of 12 police. 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . m. A police officer employed by a regents 14 institution. 15 Sec. 3. Section 80B.11, subsection 1, paragraph h, Code 16 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 17 Sec. 4. Section 80B.13, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. Receive, investigate, and review 20 complaints regarding an employing agencyâs training of law 21 enforcement officers, including compliance with minimum 22 training required by law and documentation deficiencies. The 23 council may order corrective action, including providing 24 training or remedial training to an employing agency, to meet 25 minimum training required by statute or regulation. 26 Sec. 5. Section 80B.13A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 27 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 28 following: 29 1. For purposes of this section, âfinalâ means that all 30 appeals through a grievance procedure, civil service action, 31 or other cause of action or procedure available to the officer 32 have been exhausted. 33 Sec. 6. Section 80B.13A, subsection 2, paragraphs b and c, 34 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 35 -1- LSB 2606YC (1) 91 as/js 1/ 15 H.F. _____ b. Been discharged for serious misconduct from employment 1 as a law enforcement officer or from appointment as a reserve 2 peace officer, as applicable Manufactured, sold, or conspired 3 to manufacture or sell a controlled substance other than as 4 part of an authorized act in connection with official duties . 5 c. Left, voluntarily quit, or been laid off when 6 disciplinary investigation or action was imminent or pending 7 which could have resulted in the law enforcement officer being 8 discharged or the reserve peace officer being removed for 9 serious misconduct, if the council determines that the officer 10 engaged in serious misconduct Pled guilty to or been convicted 11 of a crime of domestic violence or domestic abuse assault . 12 Sec. 7. Section 80B.13A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 13 by adding the following new paragraphs: 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Pled guilty to or been convicted of 15 any offense classified as a tier I, tier II, or tier III sex 16 offense in chapter 692A. 17 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Pled guilty to or been convicted of any 18 offense under prior laws of this state or another jurisdiction, 19 or any offense under prior law that was prosecuted in a 20 federal, military, or foreign court that is comparable to an 21 offense listed in this subsection. 22 Sec. 8. Section 80B.13A, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 23 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 24 following: 25 3. The council may order remedial training of a law 26 enforcement officer or reserve peace officer or revoke or 27 suspend the certification of a law enforcement officer or 28 reserve peace officer due to any of the following: 29 a. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 30 while under oath or affirmation knowingly testifies falsely 31 regarding a material fact in any court of law or administrative 32 hearing with the intent to deceive. 33 b. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 34 makes a materially false statement in a document prescribed by 35 -2- LSB 2606YC (1) 91 as/js 2/ 15 H.F. _____ the academy or otherwise provided for or authorized by these 1 rules, or in any other document intended to induce the academy 2 or the council to take or withhold action. 3 c. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 4 pleads guilty to or is convicted of a crime involving moral 5 turpitude. For the purposes of this subsection, a crime of 6 moral turpitude includes theft, identity theft, perjury or 7 its subordination, fraudulent practices, securities fraud, 8 extortion, or convictions by any other state or by the federal 9 government under statutes substantially corresponding to the 10 crimes listed in this subsection. 11 d. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 12 is shown to have discriminated against any applicant or 13 employee because of the age, race, creed, color, sex, sexual 14 orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, or 15 disability in violation of chapter 216. 16 e. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 17 retaliates against another law enforcement officer, reserve 18 peace officer, employee, or officer as defined in section 80F.1 19 because of exercising rights or privileges afforded by law. 20 f. The law enforcement officer retaliates against another 21 law enforcement officer, reserve peace officer, employee, or 22 officer as defined in section 80F.1, for whistleblowing. 23 g. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 24 fails to complete minimum training requirements established by 25 the law enforcement academy. 26 h. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 27 is addicted to alcohol or illegal drugs and has refused to or 28 failed to be rehabilitated. 29 i. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer pled 30 guilty to or was convicted of using objectively unreasonable 31 force in violation of chapter 704. 32 j. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 33 refuses or fails to complete the terms of a valid settlement 34 agreement regarding the officerâs certification. 35 -3- LSB 2606YC (1) 91 as/js 3/ 15 H.F. _____ k. Upon the recommendation of the attorney general to the 1 council that revocation or suspension would be appropriate 2 pursuant to section 13.12. 3 l. The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 4 possessed an illegal drug other than as part of an authorized 5 act in connection with official duties. 6 Sec. 9. Section 80B.13A, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2025, are 7 amended to read as follows: 8 4. a. An employing agency shall notify the council within 9 ten days of any termination of employment of a law enforcement 10 officer or appointment as a reserve peace officer. The 11 notification must state whether the law enforcement officer or 12 reserve peace officer was discharged or removed for serious 13 misconduct or whether the officer left, voluntarily quit, or 14 was laid off when disciplinary investigation or action was 15 imminent or pending which could have resulted in the officer 16 being discharged or removed for serious misconduct resigned in 17 lieu of termination, or was discharged or removed, and whether 18 action taken by the agency is final . 19 b. If after the employing agency submits a notification 20 under subsection 4, the law enforcement officer or reserve 21 peace officer exercises any right to hold the decision of an 22 employing agency in abeyance, appeals, grieves, brings a cause 23 of action under section 80F.1, subsection 13, or contests the 24 officerâs termination as provided by law, the employing agency 25 shall notify the council in writing within ten days of the 26 filing of such action by the officer. 27 c. Upon request by the council, the employing agency shall 28 provide any additional information or documentation about the 29 officer including confidential records or information under 30 section 22.7 or other applicable law to the council. 31 5. a. Any recommendation, notification , or other record 32 or information provided by an employing agency or the attorney 33 general pursuant to this section shall be confidential except 34 as required by rule or order of the council, an administrative 35 -4- LSB 2606YC (1) 91 as/js 4/ 15 H.F. _____ law judge, or a reviewing court. 1 b. Any notification or other record or information provided 2 by an employing agency or the attorney general pursuant to this 3 section shall be provided to the law enforcement officer or 4 reserve peace officer by the academy or employing agency at no 5 charge upon written request from the officer or the officerâs 6 legal counsel. 7 c. Any employing agency or person who, acting reasonably and 8 in good faith, files a notification or recommendation, releases 9 information, or otherwise cooperates with an investigation 10 under this section is immune from any liability, civil or 11 criminal, which might otherwise be incurred or imposed for such 12 action civil liability for monetary damages . 13 d. Upon written request of a law enforcement officer 14 or reserve peace officer or the officerâs legal counsel, 15 the academy shall provide its complete investigation report 16 concerning the officer without unnecessary delay. 17 Sec. 10. Section 80B.13A, Code 2025, is amended by adding 18 the following new subsections: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. If the administrative law judge or 20 council determines that the state has met the burden of proof 21 in a contested case to show the law enforcement officer or 22 reserve peace officer committed a violation under this chapter 23 and discretionary revocation or suspension of the officerâs 24 certification is warranted, then the administrative law judge 25 or council shall determine the appropriate sanction. For the 26 purposes of this section, the administrative law judge or 27 council shall consider applicable factors, which may include 28 the nature of the conduct at issue in the circumstances, the 29 officerâs training and education, the employing agencyâs level 30 of training and supervision of the officer, the availability 31 of remedial training to correct the officerâs issues, whether 32 the officer has been provided and completed remedial training, 33 whether the officer could be or has been rehabilitated, and the 34 proportionality of the sanction to the conduct at issue. The 35 -5- LSB 2606YC (1) 91 as/js 5/ 15 H.F. _____ administrative law judge or council shall only consider, order, 1 or impose sanctions upon the officer if the alleged violations 2 are proven. 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 5B. The administrative law judge or council 4 shall dismiss unproven administrative charges against an 5 officer in a contested case with prejudice. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 5C. A decision of the council to revoke 7 the certification of a law enforcement officer or reserve 8 peace officer or to suspend a law enforcement officerâs or 9 reserve peace officerâs certification for longer than one year 10 shall be made by a two-thirds majority vote of the council. A 11 suspension against an officer less than one year or any other 12 action against an officer or employing agency shall be made by 13 a majority vote of the council. 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 5D. An action for revocation or suspension 15 of the certification of a law enforcement officer or reserve 16 peace officer shall not be maintained by the council unless the 17 action is commenced within ninety days from the date the law 18 enforcement officer or reserve peace officer has exhausted all 19 actions, appeals, or procedures available to the officer. 20 Sec. 11. NEW SECTION . 80B.13B Rules of evidence. 21 The rules of evidence shall apply to a contested case 22 involving the revocation or suspension of a law enforcement 23 officerâs or reserve peace officerâs certification. 24 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 80B.13C Authority of the attorney 25 general. 26 1. The attorney general shall have the authority to dismiss 27 a petition in whole or in part against a law enforcement 28 officer or reserve peace officer in a contested case in the 29 interest of justice. 30 2. The attorney general may negotiate and settle a contested 31 case in the interest of justice. 32 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 80B.13D Reinstatement. 33 1. A law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer 34 whose certification was suspended shall be reinstated upon the 35 -6- LSB 2606YC (1) 91 as/js 6/ 15 H.F. _____ officerâs completion of the suspension. 1 2. If the law enforcement officerâs or reserve peace 2 officerâs certification was suspended pursuant to an agreement 3 with the attorney general, administrative law judge, or 4 council, the officerâs certification shall be reinstated upon 5 completion of the suspension and any terms of the agreement. 6 Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an 7 agreement with mutually agreed upon terms. 8 3. The academy shall not adopt or enforce rules regarding 9 the reinstatement of certification for a law enforcement 10 officer or reserve peace officer. 11 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 80B.13E Fees and costs. 12 A law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer who 13 substantially prevails in a contested decertification or 14 suspension action may petition the district court for an 15 award of reasonable attorney fees, expert fees, and costs 16 and expenses incurred in defending the contested case. The 17 district court shall award reasonable attorney fees, expert 18 fees, and costs and expenses to the officer who substantially 19 prevailed in the contested case. 20 Sec. 15. Section 80F.1, subsection 1, paragraphs c, e, and 21 f, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 22 c. âFormal administrative investigationâ means an 23 investigative process ordered by a commanding officer of an 24 agency or commanderâs designee during which the questioning 25 of an officer is intended to gather evidence to determine the 26 merit of a complaint to investigate the merit of a complaint, 27 including by questioning the complainant or witnesses, 28 or conducting an interview of the officer subject to the 29 complaint, and identifying and gathering evidence narrowly 30 tailored to the complaint, which may be the basis for seeking 31 removal, discharge, or suspension, or other disciplinary action 32 against the officer. 33 e. âInterviewâ means the questioning of an officer 34 who is the subject of a complaint pursuant to the formal 35 -7- LSB 2606YC (1) 91 as/js 7/ 15 H.F. _____ administrative investigation procedures of the investigating 1 agency, if such a complaint may be the basis for seeking 2 removal, discharge, or suspension, or other disciplinary action 3 against the officer. âInterviewâ does not include questioning 4 as part of any informal inquiry or questioning related to minor 5 infractions of agency rules which that will not result in 6 removal, discharge, suspension, or other disciplinary action 7 against the officer. An interview conducted under this section 8 shall not be construed to be a hearing. 9 f. âOfficerâ means a certified law enforcement officer, 10 fire fighter, emergency medical technician, paramedic, medical 11 provider, corrections officer, detention officer, jailer, 12 probation or parole officer, public safety telecommunicator, 13 dispatcher, or any other law enforcement officer certified , 14 in training to become certified, or whose certification 15 is governed by the Iowa law enforcement academy and who is 16 employed by a municipality, county, or state agency. 17 Sec. 16. Section 80F.1, subsections 5 and 9, Code 2025, are 18 amended to read as follows: 19 5. a. An officer who is the subject of a complaint , 20 shall , at a minimum, be provided a written summary copy of the 21 complaint prior to an interview. If a collective bargaining 22 agreement applies, the complaint or written summary shall be 23 provided pursuant to the procedures established under the 24 collective bargaining agreement. If the complaint alleges 25 domestic abuse, sexual abuse, workplace harassment, or sexual 26 harassment, an officer shall not receive more than a written 27 summary of the complaint. 28 b. Upon written request of the officer or the officerâs 29 legal counsel, the employing agency shall provide to the 30 officer or the officerâs legal counsel a complete copy of the 31 officerâs incident report, prior statements, and the officerâs 32 video or audio recordings from the incident giving rise to the 33 complaint without unnecessary delay and at no charge prior to 34 an interview of the officer. Nothing in this paragraph shall 35 -8- LSB 2606YC (1) 91 as/js 8/ 15 H.F. _____ be construed to constitute a disclosure of public records. 1 9. If a formal administrative investigation results in 2 the removal, discharge, or suspension, or other disciplinary 3 action against an officer, copies of any witness statements 4 and the complete investigative agencyâs report shall be timely 5 provided to the officer upon the request of the officer or 6 the officerâs legal counsel upon request at the completion 7 of the investigation Upon written request, an officer or the 8 officerâs legal counsel shall be timely provided with the 9 written complaint, copies of any witness statements, and the 10 investigative agencyâs complete report . 11 Sec. 17. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of 12 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 13 Sec. 18. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following applies 14 retroactively to January 1, 2024, for pending contested cases: 15 The section of this Act enacting section 80B.13C. 16 Sec. 19. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following applies 17 retroactively to January 1, 2023, for pending contested cases: 18 The section of this Act enacting section 80B.13D. 19